North Carolina, session 2025, SB955.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 14-269.2 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(i2) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person 18 years of age or older who
carries or possesses, whether openly or concealed, a self-defense device on any property owned,
used, or operated by a school of higher education. Further, a school of higher education shall not
prohibit a person 18 years of age or older, including a staff member, student, employee, or other
person lawfully present on the property owned, used, or operated by the school of higher
education, from carrying a self-defense device for purposes of self-defense while on property
owned, used, or operated by the school of higher education. For purposes of this subsection, the
following definitions apply:
(1) School of higher education. – A community college, college, or university.
(2) Self-defense device. – Pepper spray, pepper gel, mace, a taser, an ordinary
pocket knife, or other similar nonlethal devices. This term does not include
any device enumerated in subsection (b), (b1), or (d) of this section that is not
otherwise specifically allowed under this subdivision. For purposes of this
subdivision, the term "ordinary pocket knife" is as defined in G.S. 14-269."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 14-269 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-269. Carrying concealed weapons.
(a) It shall be unlawful for any person willfully and intentionally to carry concealed about
his or her person any bowie knife, dirk, dagger, slung shot, loaded cane, metallic knuckles, razor,
shuriken, stun gun, or other deadly weapon of like kind, except when the person is on the person's
own premises.
…
(e) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a person 18 years of age or older who,
in accordance with G.S. 14-269.2(i2), carries concealed a self-defense device on property owned,
used, or operated by a school of higher education. The definitions set forth in G.S. 14-269.2(i2)
apply to the terms in this subsection."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of Governors
of The University of North Carolina the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to advertise the changes occurring in Section 1 of this act to
members of the public and students and staff at public and private institutions of higher education
located in North Carolina.
*S955-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Section 1 of this act becomes effective December 1, 2026, and applies
to offenses committed on or after that date. The remainder of this act becomes effective July 1,
2026.
Page 2 Senate Bill 955-First Edition